Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2910
Association; not a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association.

The association shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 24.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 10.